Illinois, session 104th, SB3292.
Be it enacted by the People of the State of Illinois, 3represented in the General Assembly: 4    Section 5. The Illinois State Police Act is amended by 5adding Section 3.5 as follows: 6    (20 ILCS 2610/3.5 new)7    Sec. 3.5. Collective bargaining agreements. The Illinois 8State Police Merit Board is bound by the terms and conditions 9of any collective bargaining agreement in place between the 10Illinois State Police and its employees. Neither the Board nor 11its employees or representatives may act contrary to the terms 12of a collective bargaining agreement that applies to any 13employees under its authority.